Hawaii statutes.
[§445-134.12] Pawn finance charge. (a)
Pawn finance charges shall be deemed to be earned at the time the agreement for
the pawn transaction is made and shall not be subject to a refund.

(b) The maturity date of any pawn transaction
may be changed to a subsequent date no more than two times by agreement between
the customer and the pawnbroker upon payment of the pawn finance charge, and in
that event the pawnbroker may contract for and receive another pawn finance
charge computed in accordance with this part as for a new transaction.

(c) Pledged goods not redeemed by the customer
on or before the date fixed as the maturity date for the transaction in the
pawn agreement shall be held by the pawnbroker for at least thirty days
following the maturity date, and may be redeemed by the original customer
within the holding period by the payment of an additional pawn finance charge
equal to one-thirtieth of the pawn finance charge stated in the pawn
transaction agreement for each day following the maturity date, including the
day on which the pledged goods are redeemed.

(d) Where a pawnbroker is conducting business
in accordance with this part, the pawn finance charge shall not be governed by
chapter 478. [L 1992, c 192, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next